South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S355.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 61-6-1140 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 61-6-1140. A holder of a valid micro-distillery or manufacturer license issued by the State may permit tastings and retail sales of the alcoholic liquors produced at the licensed premises subject to the following limitations and any other limitations provided in this subarticle: (1) tastings by and sales to consumers must be held in conjunction with a tour by the consumer of the on-site licensed premises and the micro-distillery or manufacturer may charge an amount in its discretion for the tour.  The amount consumers are charged must be on a scale that accords with the amount of alcoholic liquors for on-premises consumption that is dispensed to consumers; (2) the micro-distillery or manufacturer shall establish appropriate protocols to ensure that a consumer sold or served alcoholic liquors pursuant to this section is not under twenty-one years of age and that a consumer shall not attend more than one tasting in a day; (3) the amount charged by micro-distilleries and manufacturers for tours must increase incrementally and accord with the amount of alcoholic liquors provided for on-premises consumption by one-half ounce, beginning with a base tour price corresponding with the provision of one ounce of alcoholic liquor; (4) the micro-distillery or manufacturer may not dispense more than four and one-half ounces to an individual consumer in one day; (5) tastings and sales may occur only between the hours of nine 9:00 a.m. and seven10:00 p.m., Monday through Saturday, and between the hours of 12:00 p.m. and 7:00 p.m. on Sundays; (6) retail sales may occur only between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m., Monday through Saturday, and between the hours of 12:00 p.m. and 7:00 p.m. on Sundays; (6)(7) the micro-distillery or manufacturer may not charge for alcoholic liquors consumed at a tasting; (7)(8) the micro-distillery or manufacturer may provide mixers, which must be nonalcoholic and carry zero percent of alcohol by weight, in conjunction with the tasting, but the micro-distillery or manufacturer may not charge for the mixers; (8)(9) only brands of alcoholic liquors actually manufactured, distilled, or fermented at and distributed to wholesalers from the licensed premises may be sold or offered for tasting;  and (9)(10) a micro-distillery or a manufacturer licensed pursuant to Section 61-6-1155 must comply with the discount pricing provisions of Section 61-6-4550, as applicable, and may not dispense alcoholic liquors for free at a tasting in subsection (6)(7) of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 61-6-1150(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) sell at retail no more than the equivalent of six twelve 750-milliliter bottles of alcoholic liquors to a consumer in one business day; SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----